Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6017YH (1) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2414 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 12B.10D General fund investment 1 allocations. 2 The treasurer of state shall invest twenty percent of the 3 public moneys in the general fund of the state in gold, silver, 4 platinum, and palladium and shall invest ten percent in equity 5 interests in businesses engaged in the production of gold, 6 silver, platinum, palladium, oil, and natural gas. 7